Utah statutes.
58-24b-503.   Lawful and unlawful use of titles and terms -- Unlawful advertising or promotion.

(1)  A person who is a licensed physical therapist shall use the letters "PT" in connection with the person's name or business in order to indicate that the person is a licensed physical therapist.

(2)  A person who is a licensed physical therapist assistant shall use the letters "PTA" in connection with the person's name or business in order to indicate that the person is a licensed physical therapist assistant.

(3)  It is unlawful for a person who is not a licensed physical therapist, a licensed physical therapist assistant, or a person described in Subsection 58-24b-304(1)(e) to:

(a)  use, in connection with the person's name or business, any of the following words or abbreviations:

(i)  physical therapy, except to the extent that the word is used to describe conduct that a person is licensed to engage in under another law of the state;

(ii)  physiotherapy; or

(iii)  any other word, abbreviation, or insignia, indicating or implying, directly or indirectly, that the person practices physical therapy; or

(b)  offer, provide, or bill a person for:

(i)  physical therapy services or anything that is characterized as physical therapy services; or

(ii)  physiotherapy services or anything that is characterized as physiotherapy services.

(4)  It is unlawful for a person who is not a licensed physical therapist to:

(a)  except as provided in Subsection (6), use, in connection with the person's name or business, any of the following words or abbreviations:

(i)  physical therapist;

(ii)  physiotherapist;

(iii)  PT;

(iv)  DPT;

(v)  MPT; or

(vi)  any other word, abbreviation, or insignia, indicating or implying, directly or indirectly, that the person is a physical therapist or physiotherapist;

(b)  advertise that a person who is not a licensed physical therapist is a physical therapist or physiotherapist; or

(c)  promote a person who is not a licensed physical therapist as a physical therapist or physiotherapist.

(5)  It is unlawful for a person who is not a licensed physical therapist assistant to:

(a)  use, in connection with the person's name or business, any of the following words or abbreviations:

(i)  physical therapist assistant;

(ii)  physiotherapist assistant;

(iii)  PTA; or

(iv)  any other word, abbreviation, or insignia, indicating or implying, directly or indirectly, that the person is a physical therapist assistant or a physiotherapist assistant;

(b)  advertise that a person who is not a licensed physical therapist assistant is a physical therapist assistant or a physiotherapist assistant; or

(c)  promote a person who is not a licensed physical therapist assistant as a physical therapist assistant or physiotherapist assistant.

(6)  Subsection (4)(a) does not prohibit a person from using a word or abbreviation described in Subsection (4)(a) in connection with the person's business, if the person employs a physical therapist at the person's business.



Enacted by Chapter 220, 2009 General Session

